Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2288
Restitution; imposed on organization; persons liable to pay; failure; effect.

If restitution is imposed on an organization, it shall be the duty of any person authorized to order the disbursement of assets of the organization, and his or her superiors, to pay the restitution from assets of the organization under his or her control. Failure to do so shall render a person subject to an order to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt of court.

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 9.